Mississippi, session 2026, HB1548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Alcorn State University Agriculture, Science, Commerce, Engineering, Nursing, and Technical Skills (ASCENT) To Excellence Early College Act". SECTION 2. (a)  The Mississippi Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall oversee the development and implementation of an on-campus early-college high school at Alcorn State University.  The board shall have independent and exclusive autonomy to promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the operation, funding and governance of the on-campus early-college high school to be administered on the campus of Alcorn State University. (b)  In addition, the board may allow Alcorn State University to establish and enter into a contractual partnership with a local public school district for the operation of a charter school on its campus. SECTION 3.  (1) There is created the Agriculture, Science, Commerce, Engineering, Nursing, and Technical Skills (ASCENT) to Excellence Early College High School for Grades 9 through 12 at Alcorn State University. (2)  The (ASCENT) to Excellence Early College High School shall be administered by Alcorn State University under the direction and oversight of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning.  The school shall emphasize a curriculum on agriculture, science, commerce and business, engineering, nursing or technical skills, trades and workforce development that optimize opportunities for credentialing and certification, or any combination thereof. SECTION 4. Eligible students in Grades 9 through 12 may be selected from across various school districts throughout the State of Mississippi to attend the ASCENT to Excellence Early College High School at Alcorn State University. SECTION 5.  (1) Alcorn State University shall: (a)  Allocate space within existing facilities or construct appropriate facilities for classrooms, laboratories and optional residential housing for students selected to participate in the ASCENT to Excellence Early College High School; (b)  Employ the requisite number of licensed teachers, administrators, staff and certified instructors with specific subject matter credentials in the content areas and subsidiary courses offered at each host institution to meet academic and operational requirements; (c)  Establish minimum standards governing annual increases in the academic performance indicators that are agreed upon with the board; (d)  No later than thirty (30) days following the initial start of the school year, conduct ongoing assessments of student performance enrolled in the program, including an initial baseline assessment of knowledge and skills in each grade level and academic content area in which instruction is provided; (e)  Establish data-driven instructional programs; (f) Provide curriculum that is aligned with state academic standards for college and career readiness; (g)  Develop appropriate educational goals for each student and offer differentiated instruction to meet the needs of all students; (h)  Provide academic support and interventions, including tutoring and other appropriate educational assistance, that are targeted for students who perform below proficiency standards on an academic performance indicator; (i)  Provide for a minimum of instructional hours as applicable, which may include any of the following: (i)  An extended school day; (ii)  An extended school year; (iii)  A minimum of four (4) weeks of summer school; and (iv)  Saturday instructional classes; (j)  Provide programs to improve professional development programs for administrators, teachers and support professionals that focus on communication centered upon student academic and career goals; and (k)  Formulate and implement programs designed to improve the learning environment and school culture, which shall include measures to ensure the safety of students and staff, and may include the following: (i)  Positive behavioral supports; (ii)  Professional development; and (iii)  Coordination with community partners. (2)  Alcorn State University is encouraged to establish partnerships with local businesses, industries and educational organizations to provide mentorship, internships and career development opportunities for students. SECTION 6. (1)  Enrollment in the ASCENT to Excellence Early College High School shall be open on a first-come, first-served basis to students in Grades 9 through 12. Priority shall be given to low-income students attending schools or enrolled in school districts with low academic performance as determined by Section 37-17-6. (2)  The program shall offer a rigorous academic curriculum and specialized focus areas, which shall include, at a minimum:                (a)  Agricultural and land-grant programs; (b)  Science and mathematics; (c)  Commerce and business; (d)  Engineering and robotics; (e)  Nursing and allied healthcare pathways; (f)  Skilled trades, including welding, coding, auto-mechanics, HVAC and advanced manufacturing; (g)  Dual enrollment opportunities with host institutions shall be provided in accordance with Section 37-15-38; or (h)  Any combination thereof of the preceding components. (3)  Additionally, the program shall ensure that tutoring, counseling and career mentorship are available to all students. (4)  A residential option shall be offered to students accepted into the program and residing more than thirty (30) miles from the main campus of Alcorn State University, contingent upon funding.  Provided that funding is made available to facilitate a residential boarding component of the program, such facilities shall include dormitories, dining services, and staff supervision, adhering to safety standards provided under Section 45-11-101. SECTION 7. (1)  Implementation and operation of the ASCENT to Excellence Early College High School at Alcorn State University is contingent upon annual appropriations by the Legislature to the board, which shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) for a maximum aggregate not to exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) annually to include any construction, repair or renovation, or expansion of existing facilities at Alcorn State University for purposes of this act only for a period not to exceed five (5) years and an aggregate program total of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00). (2)  Annual budget estimates shall be prepared by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning in collaboration with Alcorn State University and submitted to the Legislature.  For the operation and support of the program, the board and Alcorn State University may receive contributions, donations, gifts, bequests of money, other forms of financial assistance and property, equipment, materials or manpower from persons, foundations, trust funds, corporations, organizations and other sources, public or private, to be expended and utilized by the boards in carrying out the ASCENT to Excellence Early College High School. SECTION 8. (1)  The board shall conduct a study and prepare an annual written report on the effectiveness of the early college high school and shall submit the same to the Governor, the chairpersons of the Education Committees of the House and Senate, and the chairpersons of the Universities and Colleges Committees of the House and Senate.  The report shall include: (a) Enrollment and demographic data; (b) Academic and workforce outcomes; and (c) Financial summaries and funding needs. (2)  A comprehensive program evaluation shall be conducted every three (3) years to assess effectiveness in improving academic performance and workforce readiness. SECTION 9.  Section 37-13-81, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-81.  There is created the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement within the Office of Dropout Prevention of the State Department of Education.  The office shall be responsible for the administration of a statewide system of enforcement of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law (Section 37-13-91) and for the supervision of school attendance officers throughout the state. SECTION 10.  Section 37-13-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-83.  The State Superintendent of Public Education shall appoint a director for the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement, who shall meet all qualifications established for school attendance officer supervisors and any additional qualifications that may be established by the State Superintendent of Public Education or State Personnel Board.  The director shall be responsible for the proper administration of the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement in conformity with the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law and any other regulations or policies that may be adopted by the State Board of Education.  The director shall report directly to the Director of the Office of Dropout Prevention. SECTION 11.  Section 37-13-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-85.  The Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement shall have the following powers and duties, in addition to all others imposed or granted by law: (a)  To establish any policies or guidelines concerning the employment of school attendance officers which serve to effectuate a uniform system of enforcement under the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law throughout the state, and to designate the number of school attendance officers which shall be employed to serve in each school district area; (b)  To supervise and assist school attendance officer supervisors in the performance of their duties; (c)  To establish minimum standards for enrollment and attendance for the state and each individual school district, and to monitor the success of the state and districts in achieving the required levels of performance; (d)  To provide to school districts failing to meet the established standards for enrollment and attendance assistance in reducing absenteeism or the dropout rates in those districts; (e)  To establish any qualifications, in addition to those required under Section 37-13-89, for school attendance officers as the office deems necessary to further the purposes of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; (f)  To develop and implement a system under which school districts are required to maintain accurate records that document enrollment and attendance in such a manner that the records reflect all changes in enrollment and attendance, and to require school attendance officers to submit information concerning public school attendance on a monthly basis to the office; (g)  To prepare the form of the certificate of enrollment required under the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law and to furnish a sufficient number of the certificates of enrollment to each school attendance officer in the state; (h)  To provide to the State Board of Education statistical information concerning absenteeism, dropouts and other attendance-related problems as requested by the State Board of Education; (i)  To provide for the certification of school attendance officers; (j)  To provide for a course of training and education for school attendance officers, and to require successful completion of the course as a prerequisite to certification by the office as school attendance officers; (k)  To adopt any guidelines or policies the office deems necessary to effectuate an orderly transition from the supervision of school attendance officers by district attorneys to the supervision by the school attendance officer supervisors; (l)  Beginning on July 1, 1998, to require school attendance officer supervisors to employ persons employed by district attorneys before July 1, 1998, as school attendance officers without requiring such persons to submit an application or interview for employment with the State Department of Education; (m)  To adopt policies or guidelines linking the duties of school attendance officers to the appropriate courts, law enforcement agencies and community service providers; and (n)  To adopt any other policies or guidelines that the office deems necessary for the enforcement of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; however, the policies or guidelines shall not add to or contradict with the requirements of Section 37-13-91. SECTION 12.  Section 37-13-87, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-87.  (1)  The Director of the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement shall employ three (3) school attendance officer supervisors, each to maintain an office within a different Supreme Court district.  Each supervisor shall be responsible for the enforcement of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law within his district and shall exercise direct supervision over the school attendance officers in the district.  The supervisors, who shall report to the director of the office, shall assist the school attendance officers in the performance of their duties as established by law or otherwise. (2)  No person having less than eight (8) years combined actual experience as a school attendance officer, school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field, and/or social worker in the state shall be employed as a school attendance officer supervisor.  Further, a school attendance officer supervisor shall possess a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field or shall have actual experience as a school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing such degree or social worker; however, these requirements shall not apply to persons employed as school attendance officers before January 1, 1987.  School attendance officers shall meet any additional qualifications established by the State Personnel Board for school attendance officers or school attendance officer supervisors.  The school attendance officer supervisors shall receive an annual salary to be set by the State Superintendent of Public Education, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board. SECTION 13.  Section 37-13-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-89.  (1)  In each school district within the state, there shall be employed the number of school attendance officers determined by the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement to be necessary to adequately enforce the provisions of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; however, this number shall not exceed one hundred fifty-three (153) school attendance officers at any time. From and after July 1, 1998, all school attendance officers employed pursuant to this section shall be employees of the State Department of Education.  The State Department of Education shall employ all persons employed as school attendance officers by district attorneys before July 1, 1998, and shall assign them to school attendance responsibilities in the school district in which they were employed before July 1, 1998.  The first twelve (12) months of employment for each school attendance officer shall be the probationary period of state service. (2)  (a)  The State Department of Education shall obtain current criminal records background checks and current child abuse registry checks on all persons applying for the position of school attendance officer after July 2, 2002.  The criminal records information and registry checks must be kept on file for any new hires.  In order to determine an applicant's suitability for employment as a school attendance officer, the applicant must be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) for a national criminal history record check.  The applicant shall pay the fee, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00), for the fingerprinting and criminal records background check; however, the State Department of Education, in its discretion, may pay the fee for the fingerprinting and criminal records background check on behalf of any applicant.  Under no circumstances may a member of the State Board of Education, employee of the State Department of Education or any person other than the subject of the criminal records background check disseminate information received through any such checks except insofar as required to fulfill the purposes of this subsection. (b)  If the fingerprinting or criminal records check discloses a felony conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony of possession or sale of drugs, murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, rape, sexual battery, sex offense listed in Section 45-33-23(h), child abuse, arson, grand larceny, burglary, gratification of lust or aggravated assault which has not been reversed on appeal or for which a pardon has not been granted, the applicant is not eligible to be employed as a school attendance officer.  Any employment of an applicant pending the results of the fingerprinting and criminal records check is voidable if the new hire receives a disqualifying criminal records check. However, the State Board of Education, in its discretion, may allow an applicant aggrieved by an employment decision under this subsection to appear before the board, or before a hearing officer designated for that purpose, to show mitigating circumstances that may exist and allow the new hire to be employed as a school attendance officer.  The State Board of Education may grant waivers for mitigating circumstances, which may include, but are not necessarily limited to:  (i) age at which the crime was committed; (ii) circumstances surrounding the crime; (iii) length of time since the conviction and criminal history since the conviction; (iv) work history; (v) current employment and character references; and (vi) other evidence demonstrating the ability of the person to perform the responsibilities of a school attendance officer competently and that the person does not pose a threat to the health or safety of children. (c)  A member of the State Board of Education or employee of the State Department of Education may not be held liable in any employment discrimination suit in which an allegation of discrimination is made regarding an employment decision authorized under this section. (3)  Each school attendance officer shall possess a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field or shall have no less than three (3) years combined actual experience as a school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing such degree, and/or social worker; however, these requirements shall not apply to persons employed as school attendance officers before January 1, 1987. School attendance officers also shall satisfy any additional requirements that may be established by the State Personnel Board for the position of school attendance officer. (4)  It shall be the duty of each school attendance officer to: (a)  Cooperate with any public agency to locate and identify all compulsory-school-age children who are not attending school; (b)  Cooperate with all courts of competent jurisdiction; (c)  Investigate all cases of nonattendance and unlawful absences by compulsory-school-age children not enrolled in a nonpublic school; (d)  Provide appropriate counseling to encourage all school-age children to attend school until they have completed high school; (e)  Attempt to secure the provision of social or welfare services that may be required to enable any child to attend school; (f)  Contact the home or place of residence of a compulsory-school-age child and any other place in which the officer is likely to find any compulsory-school-age child when the child is absent from school during school hours without a valid written excuse from school officials, and when the child is found, the officer shall notify the parents and school officials as to where the child was physically located; (g)  Contact promptly the home of each compulsory-school-age child in the school district within the officer's jurisdiction who is not enrolled in school or is not in attendance at public school and is without a valid written excuse from school officials; if no valid reason is found for the nonenrollment or absence from the school, the school attendance officer shall give written notice to the parent, guardian or custodian of the requirement for the child's enrollment or attendance; (h)  Collect and maintain information concerning absenteeism, dropouts and other attendance-related problems, as may be required by law or the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement; and (i)  Perform all other duties relating to compulsory school attendance established by the State Department of Education or district school attendance supervisor, or both. (5)  While engaged in the performance of his duties, each school attendance officer shall carry on his person a badge identifying him as a school attendance officer under the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement of the State Department of Education and an identification card designed by the State Superintendent of Public Education and issued by the school attendance officer supervisor. Neither the badge nor the identification card shall bear the name of any elected public official. (6)  The State Personnel Board shall develop a salary scale for school attendance officers as part of the variable compensation plan.  The various pay ranges of the salary scale shall be based upon factors including, but not limited to, education, professional certification and licensure, and number of years of experience. School attendance officers shall be paid in accordance with this salary scale. The minimum salaries under the scale shall be no less than the following: (a)  For school attendance officers holding a bachelor's degree or any other attendance officer who does not hold such a degree, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $24,528.29 5 - 8 years 26,485.29 9 - 12 years 28,050.89 13 - 16 years 29,616.49 Over 17 years 31,182.09 (b)  For school attendance officers holding a license as a social worker, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $25,558.29 5 - 8 years 27,927.29 9 - 12 years 29,822.49 13 - 16 years 31,717.69 17 - 20 years 33,612.89 Over 21 years 35,415.39 (c)  For school attendance officers holding a master's degree in a behavioral science or a related field, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $26,382.29 5 - 8 years 29,008.79 9 - 12 years 31,109.99 13 - 16 years 33,211.19 17 - 20 years 35,312.39 Over 21 years 37,413.59 (7)  (a)  Each school attendance officer employed by a district attorney on June 30, 1998, who became an employee of the State Department of Education on July 1, 1998, shall be awarded credit for personal leave and major medical leave for his continuous service as a school attendance officer under the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency.  The credit for personal leave shall be in an amount equal to one-third (1/3) of the maximum personal leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Section 25-3-93 during his employment with the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency.  The credit for major medical leave shall be in an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the maximum major medical leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Section 25-3-95 during his employment with the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency. However, if a district attorney who employed a school attendance officer on June 30, 1998, certifies, in writing, to the State Department of Education that the school attendance officer had accumulated, pursuant to a personal leave policy or major medical leave policy lawfully adopted by the district attorney, a number of days of unused personal leave or major medical leave, or both, which is greater than the number of days to which the school attendance officer is entitled under this paragraph, the State Department of Education shall authorize the school attendance officer to retain the actual unused personal leave or major medical leave, or both, certified by the district attorney, subject to the maximum amount of personal leave and major medical leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Sections 25-3-93 and 25-3-95. (b)  For the purpose of determining the accrual rate for personal leave under Section 25-3-93 and major medical leave under Section 25-3-95, the State Department of Education shall give consideration to all continuous service rendered by a school attendance officer before July 1, 1998, in addition to the service rendered by the school attendance officer as an employee of the department. (c)  In order for a school attendance officer to be awarded credit for personal leave and major medical leave or to retain the actual unused personal leave and major medical leave accumulated by him before July 1, 1998, the district attorney who employed the school attendance officer must certify, in writing, to the State Department of Education the hire date of the school attendance officer.  For each school attendance officer employed by the youth or family court or a state agency before being designated an employee of the district attorney who has not had a break in continuous service, the hire date shall be the date that the school attendance officer was hired by the youth or family court or state agency.  The department shall prescribe the date by which the certification must be received by the department and shall provide written notice to all district attorneys of the certification requirement and the date by which the certification must be received. (8)  (a)  School attendance officers shall maintain regular office hours on a year-round basis; however, during the school term, on those days that teachers in all of the school districts served by a school attendance officer are not required to report to work, the school attendance officer also shall not be required to report to work.  (For purposes of this subsection, a school district's school term is that period of time identified as the school term in contracts entered into by the district with licensed personnel.)  A school attendance officer shall be required to report to work on any day recognized as an official state holiday if teachers in any school district served by that school attendance officer are required to report to work on that day, regardless of the school attendance officer's status as an employee of the State Department of Education, and compensatory leave may not be awarded to the school attendance officer for working during that day.  However, a school attendance officer may be allowed by the school attendance officer's supervisor to use earned leave on such days. (b)  The State Department of Education annually shall designate a period of six (6) consecutive weeks in the summer between school years during which school attendance officers shall not be required to report to work.  A school attendance officer who elects to work at any time during that period may not be awarded compensatory leave for such work and may not opt to be absent from work at any time other than during the six (6) weeks designated by the department unless the school attendance officer uses personal leave or major medical leave accrued under Section 25-3-93 or 25-3-95 for such absence. (9)  The State Department of Education shall provide all continuing education and training courses that school attendance officers are required to complete under state law or rules and regulations of the department. SECTION 14.  Section 37-13-91, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-91.  (1)  This section shall be referred to as the "Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law." (2)  The following terms as used in this section are defined as follows: (a)  "Parent" means the father or mother to whom a child has been born, or the father or mother by whom a child has been legally adopted. (b) "Guardian" means a guardian of the person of a child, other than a parent, who is legally appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction. (c) "Custodian" means any person having the present care or custody of a child, other than a parent or guardian of the child. (d)  "School day" means not less than five and one-half (5-1/2) and not more than eight (8) hours of actual teaching in which both teachers and pupils are in regular attendance for scheduled schoolwork. (e)  "School" means any public school, including a charter school, in this state or any nonpublic school in this state which is in session each school year for at least one hundred eighty (180) school days, except that the "nonpublic" school term shall be the number of days that each school shall require for promotion from grade to grade. (f)  "Compulsory-school-age child" means a child who has attained or will attain the age of six (6) years on or before September 1 of the calendar year and who has not attained the age of seventeen (17) years on or before September 1 of the calendar year; and shall include any child who has attained or will attain the age of five (5) years on or before September 1 and has enrolled in a full-day public school kindergarten program. (g)  "School attendance officer" means a person employed by the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 37-13-89. (h)  "Appropriate school official" means the superintendent of the school district, or his designee, or, in the case of a nonpublic school, the principal or the headmaster. (i)  "Nonpublic school" means an institution for the teaching of children, consisting of a physical plant, whether owned or leased, including a home, instructional staff members and students, and which is in session each school year.  This definition shall include, but not be limited to, private, church, parochial and home instruction programs. (3)  A parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child in this state shall cause the child to enroll in and attend a public school or legitimate nonpublic school for the period of time that the child is of compulsory school age, except under the following circumstances: (a)  When a compulsory-school-age child is physically, mentally or emotionally incapable of attending school as determined by the appropriate school official based upon sufficient medical documentation. (b)  When a compulsory-school-age child is enrolled in and pursuing a course of special education, remedial education or education for children with physical or mental disadvantages or disabilities. (c)  When a compulsory-school-age child is being educated in a legitimate home instruction program. The parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child described in this subsection, or the parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child attending any charter school or nonpublic school, or the appropriate school official for any or all children attending a charter school or nonpublic school shall complete a "certificate of enrollment" in order to facilitate the administration of this section. The form of the certificate of enrollment shall be prepared by the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement of the State Department of Education and shall be designed to obtain the following information only: (i)  The name, address, telephone number and date of birth of the compulsory-school-age child; (ii)  The name, address and telephone number of the parent, guardian or custodian of the compulsory-school-age child; (iii)  A simple description of the type of education the compulsory-school-age child is receiving and, if the child is enrolled in a nonpublic school, the name and address of the school; and (iv)  The signature of the parent, guardian or custodian of the compulsory-school-age child or, for any or all compulsory-school-age child or children attending a charter school or nonpublic school, the signature of the appropriate school official and the date signed. The certificate of enrollment shall be returned to the school attendance officer where the child resides on or before September 15 of each year.  Any parent, guardian or custodian found by the school attendance officer to be in noncompliance with this section shall comply, after written notice of the noncompliance by the school attendance officer, with this subsection within ten (10) days after the notice or be in violation of this section.  However, in the event the child has been enrolled in a public school within fifteen (15) calendar days after the first day of the school year as required in subsection (6), the parent or custodian may, at a later date, enroll the child in a legitimate nonpublic school or legitimate home instruction program and send the certificate of enrollment to the school attendance officer and be in compliance with this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, a legitimate nonpublic school or legitimate home instruction program shall be those not operated or instituted for the purpose of avoiding or circumventing the compulsory attendance law. (4)  An "unlawful absence" is an absence for an entire school day or during part of a school day by a compulsory-school-age child, which absence is not due to a valid excuse for temporary nonattendance.  For purposes of reporting absenteeism under subsection (6) of this section, if a compulsory-school-age child has an absence that is more than thirty-seven percent (37%) of the instructional day, as fixed by the school board for the school at which the compulsory-school-age child is enrolled, the child must be considered absent the entire school day. Days missed from school due to disciplinary suspension shall not be considered an "excused" absence under this section.  This subsection shall not apply to children enrolled in a nonpublic school. Each of the following shall constitute a valid excuse for temporary nonattendance of a compulsory-school-age child enrolled in a noncharter public school, provided satisfactory evidence of the excuse is provided to the superintendent of the school district, or his designee: (a)  An absence is excused when the absence results from the compulsory-school-age child's attendance at an authorized school activity with the prior approval of the superintendent of the school district, or his designee.  These activities may include field trips, athletic contests, student conventions, musical festivals and any similar activity. (b)  An absence is excused when the absence results from illness or injury which prevents the compulsory-school-age child from being physically able to attend school. (c)  An absence is excused when isolation of a compulsory-school-age child is ordered by the county health officer, by the State Board of Health or appropriate school official. (d)  An absence is excused when it results from the death or serious illness of a member of the immediate family of a compulsory-school-age child.  The immediate family members of a compulsory-school-age child shall include children, spouse, grandparents, parents, brothers and sisters, including stepbrothers and stepsisters. (e)  An absence is excused when it results from a medical or dental appointment of a compulsory-school-age child. (f)  An absence is excused when it results from the attendance of a compulsory-school-age child at the proceedings of a court or an administrative tribunal if the child is a party to the action or under subpoena as a witness. (g)  An absence may be excused if the religion to which the compulsory-school-age child or the child's parents adheres, requires or suggests the observance of a religious event.  The approval of the absence is within the discretion of the superintendent of the school district, or his designee, but approval should be granted unless the religion's observance is of such duration as to interfere with the education of the child. (h)  An absence may be excused when it is demonstrated to the satisfaction of the superintendent of the school district, or his designee, that the purpose of the absence is to take advantage of a valid educational opportunity such as travel, including vacations or other family travel.  Approval of the absence must be gained from the superintendent of the school district, or his designee, before the absence, but the approval shall not be unreasonably withheld. (i)  An absence may be excused when it is demonstrated to the satisfaction of the superintendent of the school district, or his designee, that conditions are sufficient to warrant the compulsory-school-age child's nonattendance.  However, no absences shall be excused by the school district superintendent, or his designee, when any student suspensions or expulsions circumvent the intent and spirit of the compulsory attendance law. (j)  An absence is excused when it results from the attendance of a compulsory-school-age child participating in official organized events sponsored by the 4-H or Future Farmers of America (FFA).  The excuse for the 4-H or FFA event must be provided in writing to the appropriate school superintendent by the Extension Agent or High School Agricultural Instructor/FFA Advisor. (k)  An absence is excused when it results from the compulsory-school-age child officially being employed to serve as a page at the State Capitol for the Mississippi House of Representatives or Senate. (5)  Any parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child subject to this section who refuses or willfully fails to perform any of the duties imposed upon him or her under this section or who intentionally falsifies any information required to be contained in a certificate of enrollment, shall be guilty of contributing to the neglect of a child and, upon conviction, shall be punished in accordance with Section 97-5-39. Upon prosecution of a parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child for violation of this section, the presentation of evidence by the prosecutor that shows that the child has not been enrolled in school within eighteen (18) calendar days after the first day of the school year of the public school which the child is eligible to attend, or that the child has accumulated twelve (12) unlawful absences during the school year at the public school in which the child has been enrolled, shall establish a prima facie case that the child's parent, guardian or custodian is responsible for the absences and has refused or willfully failed to perform the duties imposed upon him or her under this section.  However, no proceedings under this section shall be brought against a parent, guardian or custodian of a compulsory-school-age child unless the school attendance officer has contacted promptly the home of the child and has provided written notice to the parent, guardian or custodian of the requirement for the child's enrollment or attendance. (6)  If a compulsory-school-age child has not been enrolled in a school within fifteen (15) calendar days after the first day of the school year of the school which the child is eligible to attend or the child has accumulated five (5) unlawful absences during the school year of the public school in which the child is enrolled, the school district superintendent, or his designee, shall report, within two (2) school days or within five (5) calendar days, whichever is less, the absences to the school attendance officer.  The State Department of Education shall prescribe a uniform method for schools to utilize in reporting the unlawful absences to the school attendance officer.  The superintendent, or his designee, also shall report any student suspensions or student expulsions to the school attendance officer when they occur. (7)  When a school attendance officer has made all attempts to secure enrollment and/or attendance of a compulsory-school-age child and is unable to effect the enrollment and/or attendance, the attendance officer shall file a petition with the youth court under Section 43-21-451 or shall file a petition in a court of competent jurisdiction as it pertains to parent or child.  Sheriffs, deputy sheriffs and municipal law enforcement officers shall be fully authorized to investigate all cases of nonattendance and unlawful absences by compulsory-school-age children, and shall be authorized to file a petition with the youth court under Section 43-21-451 or file a petition or information in the court of competent jurisdiction as it pertains to parent or child for violation of this section. The youth court shall expedite a hearing to make an appropriate adjudication and a disposition to ensure compliance with the Compulsory School Attendance Law, and may order the child to enroll or re-enroll in school.  The superintendent of the school district to which the child is ordered may assign, in his discretion, the child to the alternative school program of the school established pursuant to Section 37-13-92. (8)  The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations for the purpose of reprimanding any school superintendents who fail to timely report unexcused absences under the provisions of this section. (9)  Notwithstanding any provision or implication herein to the contrary, it is not the intention of this section to impair the primary right and the obligation of the parent or parents, or person or persons in loco parentis to a child, to choose the proper education and training for such child, and nothing in this section shall ever be construed to grant, by implication or otherwise, to the State of Mississippi, any of its officers, agencies or subdivisions any right or authority to control, manage, supervise or make any suggestion as to the control, management or supervision of any private or parochial school or institution for the education or training of children, of any kind whatsoever that is not a public school according to the laws of this state; and this section shall never be construed so as to grant, by implication or otherwise, any right or authority to any state agency or other entity to control, manage, supervise, provide for or affect the operation, management, program, curriculum, admissions policy or discipline of any such school or home instruction program. SECTION 15.  Section 37-13-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-107.  (1)  Every school attendance officer shall be required annually to attend and complete a comprehensive course of training and education which is provided or approved by the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement of the State Department of Education.  Attendance shall be required beginning with the first training seminar conducted after the school attendance officer is employed as a school attendance officer. (2)  The Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement shall provide or approve a course of training and education for school attendance officers of the state.  The course shall consist of at least twelve (12) hours of training per year.  The content of the course of training and when and where it is to be conducted shall be approved by the office.  A certificate of completion shall be furnished by the State Department of Education to those school attendance officers who complete the course.  Each certificate shall be made a permanent record of the school attendance officer supervisor's office where the school attendance officer is employed. (3)  Upon the failure of any person employed as a school attendance officer to receive the certificate of completion from the State Department of Education within the first year of his employment, the person shall not be allowed to carry out any of the duties of a school attendance officer and shall not be entitled to compensation for the period of time during which the certificate has not been obtained. SECTION 16.  Section 37-101-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-1.  The following state institutions of higher learning shall be under the management and control of a board of trustees to be known as the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, namely: (a)  The University of Mississippi; (b)  Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science; (c)  Mississippi University for Women; (d)  The University of Southern Mississippi; (e)  Delta State University; (f)  Alcorn State University; (g)  Jackson State University; (h)  Mississippi Valley State University; (i)  And any other of like kind which may be hereafter established by the state. SECTION 17.  Section 37-121-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-121-1.  The Alcorn Agricultural and Mechanical College of Mississippi, created by act approved February 28, 1878, shall continue as a body politic and corporate, and shall henceforth be known as "Alcorn State University," without interference with the rights, powers and prerogatives of said college which continue in all respects. Whenever the name "Alcorn Agricultural and Mechanical College" appears, the same is construed to denote "Alcorn State University." SECTION 18.  Section 37-15-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-15-31.  (1)  (a)  Except as provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section, upon the petition in writing of a parent or guardian resident of the school district of an individual student filed or lodged with the president or secretary of the school board of a school district in which the pupil has been enrolled or is qualified to be enrolled as a student under Section 37-15-9, or upon the aforesaid petition or the initiative of the school board of a school district as to the transfer of a grade or grades, individual students living in one school district or a grade or grades of a school within the districts may be legally transferred to another school district, by the mutual consent of the school boards of all school districts concerned, which consent must be given in writing and spread upon the minutes of such boards. (b)  The school board of the transferring school district to which such petition may be addressed shall act thereon not later than its next regular meeting subsequent to the filing or lodging of the petition, and a failure to act within that time shall constitute a rejection of such request.  The school board of the other school district involved (the transferee board) shall act on such request for transfer as soon as possible after the transferor board shall have approved or rejected such transfer and no later than the next regular meeting of the transferee board, and a failure of such transferee board to act within such time shall constitute a rejection of such request.  If such a transfer is approved by the transferee board, then such decision shall be final.  If such a transfer should be refused by the school board of either school district, then such decision shall be final. (c)  Any legal guardianship formed for the purpose of establishing residency for school district attendance purposes shall not be recognized by the affected school board. (2)  (a)  Upon the petition in writing of any parent or guardian who is a resident of Mississippi and is an instructional or licensed employee of a school district, but not a resident of such district, the school board of the employer school district shall consent to the transfer of such employee's dependent school-age children to its district and shall spread the same upon the minutes of the board.  Upon the petition in writing of any parent or guardian who is not a resident of Mississippi and who is an instructional or licensed employee of a school district in Mississippi, the school board of the employer school district shall consent to the transfer of such employee's dependent school-age children to its district and shall spread the same upon the minutes of the board. (b)  The school board of any school district, in its discretion, may adopt a uniform policy to allow the enrollment and attendance of the dependent children of noninstructional and nonlicensed employees, who are residents of Mississippi but are not residents of their district.  Such policy shall be based upon the employment needs of the district, implemented according to job classification groups and renewed each school year. (c)  The employer transferee school district shall notify in writing the school district from which the pupil or pupils are transferring, and the school board of the transferor school district shall spread the same upon its minutes. (d)  Any such agreement by school boards for the legal transfer of a student shall include a provision providing for the transportation of the student.  In the absence of such a provision the responsibility for transporting the student to the transferee school district shall be that of the parent or guardian. (e)  Any school district which accepts a student under the provisions of this subsection shall not assess any tuition fees upon such transferring student in accordance with the provisions of Section 37-19-27. (3)  Upon the petition in writing of any parent or legal guardian of a school-age child who is a resident of an adjacent school district residing in the geographical situation described in Section 37-15-29(3), the school board of the school district operating the school located in closer proximity to the residence of the child shall consent to the transfer of the child to its district, and shall spread the same upon the minutes of the board.  Any such agreement by school boards for the legal transfer of a student under this subsection shall include a provision for the transportation of the student by either the transferor or the transferee school district.  In the event that either the school board of the transferee or the transferor school district shall object to the transfer, it shall have the right to appeal to the State Board of Education whose decision shall be final. However, if the school boards agreeing on the legal transfer of any student shall fail to agree on which district shall provide transportation, the responsibility for transporting the student to the transferee school district shall be that of the parent or guardian. (4)  Upon the petition in writing of any parent or legal guardian of a school-age child who was lawfully transferred to another school district prior to July 1, 1992, as described in Section 37-15-29(4), the school board of the transferee school district shall consent to the transfer of such child and the transfer of any school-age brother and sister of such child to its district, and shall spread the same upon the minutes of the board.    (5)  (a)  If the board of trustees of a municipal separate school district with added territory does not have a member who is a resident of the added territory outside the corporate limits, upon the petition in writing of any parent or legal guardian of a school-age child who is a resident of the added territory outside the corporate limits, the board of trustees of the municipal separate school district and the school board of the school district adjacent to the added territory shall consent to the transfer of the child from the municipal separate school district to the adjacent school district.  The agreement must be spread upon the minutes of the board of trustees of the municipal separate school district and the school board of the adjacent school district.  The agreement must provide for the transportation of the student.  In the absence of such a provision, the parent or legal guardian shall be responsible for transporting the student to the adjacent school district.  Any school district that accepts a student under this subsection may not assess any tuition fees against the transferring student. (b)  Before September 1 of each year, the board of trustees of the municipal separate school district shall certify to the State Department of Education the number of students in the added territory of the municipal separate school district who are transferred to the adjacent school district under this subsection.  The municipal separate school district also shall certify the total number of students in the school district residing in the added territory plus the number of those students who are transferred to the adjacent school district.  Based upon these figures, the department shall calculate the percentage of the total number of students in the added territory who are transferred to the adjacent school district and shall certify this percentage to the levying authority for the municipal separate school district.  The levying authority shall remit to the school board of the adjacent school district, from the proceeds of the ad valorem taxes collected for the support of the municipal separate school district from the added territory of the municipal separate school district, an amount equal to the percentage of the total number of students in the added territory who are transferred to the adjacent school district. SECTION 19.  Section 37-15-38, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-15-38.  (1)  The following phrases have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  A dual enrolled student is a student who is enrolled in a community or junior college or state institution of higher learning while enrolled in high school. (b)  A dual credit student is a student who is enrolled in a community or junior college or state institution of higher learning while enrolled in high school and who is receiving high school and college credit for postsecondary coursework. (2)  A local school board, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and the Mississippi Community College Board shall establish a dual enrollment system under which students in the school district who meet the prescribed criteria of this section may be enrolled in a postsecondary institution in Mississippi while they are still in school. (3)  Dual credit eligibility. Before credits earned by a qualified high school student from a community or junior college or state institution of higher learning may be transferred to the student's home school district, the student must be properly enrolled in a dual enrollment program. (4)  Admission criteria for dual enrollment in community and junior college or university programs. The Mississippi Community College Board and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning may recommend to the State Board of Education admission criteria for dual enrollment programs under which high school students may enroll at a community or junior college or university while they are still attending high school and enrolled in high school courses.  Students may be admitted to enroll in community or junior college courses under the dual enrollment programs if they meet that individual institution's stated dual enrollment admission requirements. (5)  Tuition and cost responsibility.  Tuition and costs for university-level courses and community and junior college courses offered under a dual enrollment program may be paid for by the postsecondary institution, the local school district, the parents or legal guardians of the student, or by grants, foundations or other private or public sources.  Payment for tuition and any other costs must be made directly to the credit-granting institution. (6)  Transportation responsibility.  Any transportation required by a student to participate in the dual enrollment program is the responsibility of the parent, custodian or legal guardian of the student.  Transportation costs may be paid from any available public or private sources, including the local school district. (7)  School district net enrollment credit.  When dually enrolled, the student may be counted, for total funding formula purposes, in the net enrollment of the public school district in which the student attends high school. (8)  High school student transcript transfer requirements.  Grades and college credits earned by a student admitted to a dual credit program must be recorded on the high school student record and on the college transcript at the university or community or junior college where the student attends classes.  The transcript of the university or community or junior college coursework may be released to another institution or applied toward college graduation requirements. (9)  Determining factor of prerequisites for dual enrollment courses.  Each university and community or junior college participating in a dual enrollment program shall determine course prerequisites.  Course prerequisites shall be the same for dual enrolled students as for regularly enrolled students at that university or community or junior college. (10)  Process for determining articulation of curriculum between high school, university, and community and junior college courses.  All dual credit courses must meet the standards established at the postsecondary level.  Postsecondary level developmental courses may not be considered as meeting the requirements of the dual credit program.  Dual credit memorandum of understandings must be established between each postsecondary institution and the school district implementing a dual credit program. (11)  [Deleted] (12)  Eligible courses for dual credit programs.  Courses eligible for dual credit include, but are not necessarily limited to, foreign languages, advanced math courses, advanced science courses, performing arts, advanced business and technology, and career and technical courses.  Distance Learning Collaborative Program courses approved under Section 37-67-1 shall be fully eligible for dual credit.  All courses being considered for dual credit must receive unconditional approval from the superintendent of the local school district and the chief instructional officer at the participating community or junior college or university in order for college credit to be awarded.  A university or community or junior college shall make the final decision on what courses are eligible for semester hour credits. (13)  High school Carnegie unit equivalency.  One (1) three-hour university or community or junior college course is equal to one (1) high school Carnegie unit. (14)  Course alignment. The universities, community and junior colleges and the State Department of Education shall periodically review their respective policies and assess the place of dual credit courses within the context of their traditional offerings. (15)  Maximum dual credits allowed.  It is the intent of the dual enrollment program to make it possible for every eligible student who desires to earn a semester's worth of college credit in high school to do so.  A qualified dually enrolled high school student must be allowed to earn an unlimited number of college or university credits for dual credit. (16)  Dual credit program allowances.  A student may be granted credit delivered through the following means: (a)  Examination preparation taught at a high school by a qualified teacher.  A student may receive credit at the secondary level after completion of an approved course and passing the standard examination, such as an Advanced Placement or International Baccalaureate course through which a high school student is allowed CLEP credit by making a three (3) or higher on the end-of-course examination. (b)  College or university courses taught at a high school or designated postsecondary site by a qualified teacher who is an employee of the school district and approved as an instructor by the collaborating college or university. (c)  College or university courses taught at a college, university or high school by an instructor employed by the college or university and approved by the collaborating school district. (d)  Online courses of any public university, community or junior college in Mississippi. (17)  Qualifications of dual credit instructors.  A dual credit academic instructor must meet the requirements set forth by the regional accrediting association (Southern Association of College and Schools).  University and community and junior college personnel have the sole authority in the selection of dual credit instructors. A dual credit career and technical education instructor must meet the requirements set forth by the Mississippi Community College Board in the qualifications manual for postsecondary career and technical personnel. (18)  Guidance on local agreements.  The Chief Academic Officer of the State Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and the Chief Instructional Officers of the Mississippi Community College Board and the State Department of Education, working collaboratively, shall develop a template to be used by the individual community and junior colleges and institutions of higher learning for consistent implementation of the dual enrollment program throughout the State of Mississippi. (19)  Mississippi Works Dual Enrollment-Dual Credit Option.  A local school board and the local community colleges board shall establish a Mississippi Works Dual Enrollment-Dual Credit Option Program under which potential or recent student dropouts may dually enroll in their home school and a local community college in a dual credit program consisting of high school completion coursework and a community college credential, certificate or degree program.  Students completing the dual enrollment-credit option may obtain their high school diploma while obtaining a community college credential, certificate or degree.  The Mississippi Department of Employment Security shall assist students who have successfully completed the Mississippi Works Dual Enrollment-Dual Credit Option in securing a job upon the application of the student or the participating school or community college.  The Mississippi Works Dual Enrollment-Dual Credit Option Program will be implemented statewide in the 2012-2013 school year and thereafter.  The State Board of Education, local school board and the local community college board shall establish criteria for the Dual Enrollment-Dual Credit Program.  Students enrolled in the program will not be eligible to participate in interscholastic sports or other extracurricular activities at the home school district.  Tuition and costs for community college courses offered under the Dual Enrollment-Dual Credit Program shall not be charged to the student, parents or legal guardians.  When dually enrolled, the student shall be counted, for total funding formula purposes, in the net enrollment of the public school district in which the student attends high school.  Any transportation required by the student to participate in the Dual Enrollment-Dual Credit Program is the responsibility of the parent or legal guardian of the student, and transportation costs may be paid from any available public or private sources, including the local school district.  Grades and college credits earned by a student admitted to this Dual Enrollment-Dual Credit Program shall be recorded on the high school student record and on the college transcript at the community college and high school where the student attends classes.  The transcript of the community college coursework may be released to another institution or applied toward college graduation requirements.  Any course that is required for subject area testing as a requirement for graduation from a public school in Mississippi is eligible for dual credit, and courses eligible for dual credit shall also include career, technical and degree program courses.  All courses eligible for dual credit shall be approved by the superintendent of the local school district and the chief instructional officer at the participating community college in order for college credit to be awarded.  A community college shall make the final decision on what courses are eligible for semester hour credits and the local school superintendent, subject to approval by the Mississippi Department of Education, shall make the final decision on the transfer of college courses credited to the student's high school transcript. SECTION 20.  Section 37-16-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-16-3.  (1)  The State Department of Education is directed to implement a program of statewide assessment testing which shall provide for the improvement of the operation and management of the public schools.  The statewide program shall be timed, as far as possible, so as not to conflict with ongoing district assessment programs. As part of the program, the department shall: (a)  Establish, with the approval of the State Board of Education, minimum performance standards related to the goals for education contained in the state's plan including, but not limited to, basic skills in reading, writing and mathematics.  The minimum performance standards shall be approved by April 1 in each year they are established. (b)  Conduct a uniform statewide testing program in grades deemed appropriate in the public schools, including charter schools, which shall include the administration of a career-readiness assessment, such as, but not limited to, the ACT WorkKeys Assessment, deemed appropriate by the Mississippi Department of Education working in coordination with the Office of Workforce Development, to any students electing to take the assessment.  Each individual school district shall determine whether the assessment is administered in the tenth, eleventh or twelfth grade.  The program may test skill areas, basic skills and high school course content. (c)  Monitor the results of the assessment program and, at any time the composite student performance of a school or basic program is found to be below the established minimum standards, notify the district superintendent or the governing board of the charter school, as the case may be, the school principal and the school advisory committee or other existing parent group of the situation within thirty (30) days of its determination.  The department shall further provide technical assistance to a school district in the identification of the causes of this deficiency and shall recommend courses of action for its correction. (d)  Provide technical assistance to the school districts, when requested, in the development of student performance standards in addition to the established minimum statewide standards. (e)  Issue security procedure regulations providing for the security and integrity of the tests that are administered under the basic skills assessment program. (f)  In case of an allegation of a testing irregularity that prompts a need for an investigation by the Department of Education, the department may, in its discretion, take complete control of the statewide test administration in a school district or any part thereof, including, but not limited to, obtaining control of the test booklets and answer documents.  In the case of any verified testing irregularity that jeopardized the security and integrity of the test(s), validity or the accuracy of the test results, the cost of the investigation and any other actual and necessary costs related to the investigation paid by the Department of Education shall be reimbursed by the local school district from funds other than federal funds, total funding formula funds provided in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, or any other state funds within six (6) months from the date of notice by the department to the school district to make reimbursement to the department. (2)  Uniform basic skills tests shall be completed by each student in the appropriate grade.  These tests shall be administered in such a manner as to preserve the integrity and validity of the assessment.  In the event of excused or unexcused student absences, make-up tests shall be given.  The school superintendent of every school district in the state and the principal of each charter school shall annually certify to the State Department of Education that each student enrolled in the appropriate grade has completed the required basic skills assessment test for his or her grade in a valid test administration. (3)  Within five (5) days of completing the administration of a statewide test, the principal of the school where the test was administered shall certify under oath to the State Department of Education that the statewide test was administered in strict accordance with the Requirements of the Mississippi Statewide Assessment System as adopted by the State Board of Education.  The principal's sworn certification shall be set forth on a form developed and approved by the Department of Education.  If, following the administration of a statewide test, the principal has reason to believe that the test was not administered in strict accordance with the Requirements of the Mississippi Statewide Assessment System as adopted by the State Board of Education, the principal shall submit a sworn certification to the Department of Education setting forth all information known or believed by the principal about all potential violations of the Requirements of the Mississippi Statewide Assessment System as adopted by the State Board of Education.  The submission of false information or false certification to the Department of Education by any licensed educator may result in licensure disciplinary action pursuant to Section 37-3-2 and criminal prosecution pursuant to Section 37-16-4. SECTION 21.  Section 37-16-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-16-4.  (1)  It is unlawful for anyone knowingly and willfully to do any of the following acts regarding mandatory uniform tests administered to students as required by the State Department of Education: (a)  Give examinees access to test questions prior to testing; (b)  Copy or reproduce all or any portion of any secure test booklet; (c)  Coach examinees during testing or alter or interfere with examinees' responses in any way; (d)  Make answer keys available to examinees; (e)  Fail to account for all secure test materials before, during and after testing; (f)  Participate in, direct, aid, counsel, assist in, encourage or fail to report any of the acts prohibited in this section. (2)  Any person violating any provisions of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or be imprisoned for not more than ninety (90) days, or both.  Upon conviction, the State Board of Education may suspend or revoke the administrative or teaching credentials, or both, of the person convicted. (3)  Any person submitting a false certification to the State Department of Education that each statewide test in a school was administered in strict accordance with the Requirements of the Mississippi Statewide Assessment System as adopted by the State Board of Education, and with willful intent, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), or be imprisoned for not more than three (3) years, or both.  Upon conviction, the State Board of Education may suspend or revoke the administrative or teaching credentials, or both, of the person convicted. (4)  The district attorney shall investigate allegations of violations of this section, either on its own initiative following a receipt of allegations, or at the request of a school district or the State Department of Education. (5)  The district attorney shall furnish to the State Superintendent of Education a report of the findings of any investigation conducted pursuant to this section. (6)  The State Board of Education shall establish statistical guidelines to examine the results of state mandated tests to determine where there is evidence of testing irregularities resulting in false or misleading results in the aggregate or composite test scores of the class, grade, age group or school district.  When said irregularities are identified, the State Superintendent of Education may order that any group of students identified as being required to retake the test at state expense under state supervision.  The school district shall be given at least thirty (30) days' notice before the next test administration and shall comply with the order of the State Superintendent of Education.  The results from the second administration of the test shall be final for all uses of that data. (7)  Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit or interfere with the responsibilities of the State Board of Education or the State Department of Education in test development or selection, test form construction, standard setting, test scoring, and reporting, or any other related activities which in the judgment of the State Superintendent of Education are necessary and appropriate. SECTION 22.  Section 37-16-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-16-5.  The school board of every district in this state shall periodically assess student performance and achievement in each school.  Such assessment programs shall be based upon local goals and objectives which are compatible with the state's plan for education and which supplement the minimum performance standards approved by the State Board of Education.  Data from district assessment programs shall be provided to the State Department of Education when such data is required in order to evaluate specific instructional programs or processes or when the data is needed for other research or evaluation projects.  Each district may provide acceptable, compatible district assessment data to substitute for any assessment data needed at the state level when the State Department of Education certifies that such data is acceptable for the purposes of Section 37-16-3. SECTION 23.  Section 37-17-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-17-7.  Any nonpublic school may, through its governing body, request that the State Board of Education approve such institution.  Approval shall be based upon a process promulgated by the State Board of Education; provided, however, that in no event shall the State Board of Education adopt more stringent standards for approval of nonpublic schools than the accreditation standards applied to public schools. SECTION 24.  Section 37-17-6, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-17-6.  (1)  The State Board of Education, acting through the Commission on School Accreditation, shall establish and implement a permanent performance-based accreditation system, and all noncharter public elementary and secondary schools shall be accredited under this system. (2)  School districts shall be required to provide school classroom space that is air-conditioned as a minimum requirement for accreditation. (3)  (a)  The State Board of Education, acting through the Commission on School Accreditation, shall require that school districts employ certified school librarians according to the following formula: Number of Students                Number of Certified Per School Library                School Librarians 0 - 499 Students                  1/2 Full-time Equivalent Certified Librarian 500 or More Students              1 Full-time Certified Librarian (b)  The State Board of Education, however, may increase the number of positions beyond the above requirements. (c)  The assignment of certified school librarians to the particular schools shall be at the discretion of the local school district.  No individual shall be employed as a certified school librarian without appropriate training and certification as a school librarian by the State Department of Education. (d)  School librarians in the district shall spend at least fifty percent (50%) of direct work time in a school library and shall devote no more than one-fourth (1/4) of the workday to administrative activities that are library related. (e)  Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit any school district from employing more certified school librarians than are provided for in this section. (f)  Any additional millage levied to fund school librarians required for accreditation under this subsection shall be included in the tax increase limitation set forth in Sections 37-57-105 and 37-57-107 and shall not be deemed a new program for purposes of the limitation. (4)  [Deleted] (5)  (a) The State Department of Education, acting through the Mississippi Commission on School Accreditation, shall implement a single "A" through "F" school and school district accountability system complying with applicable federal and state requirements in order to reach the following educational goals: (i)  To mobilize resources and supplies to ensure that all students exit third grade reading on grade level; (ii)  To reduce the student dropout rate to ten percent (10%) by 2015; and (iii)  To have sixty percent (60%) of students scoring proficient and advanced on assessments. (b)  The State Department of Education shall combine the state school and school district accountability system with the federal system in order to have a single system. (c)  The State Department of Education shall establish five (5) performance categories ("A," "B," "C," "D" and "F") for the accountability system based on the following criteria: (i)  Student Achievement:  the percent of students proficient and advanced on the current state assessments; (ii)  Individual student growth:  the percent of students making one (1) year's progress in one (1) year's time on the state assessment, with an emphasis on the progress of the lowest twenty-five percent (25%) of students in the school or district; (iii)  Four-year graduation rate:  the percent of students graduating with a standard high school diploma in four (4) years, as defined by federal regulations; (iv)  The system shall include the federally compliant four-year graduation rate in school and school district accountability system calculations.  Graduation rate will apply to high school and school district accountability ratings as a compensatory component.  The system shall discontinue the use of the High School Completer Index (HSCI); (v)  The school and school district accountability system shall incorporate a standards-based growth model, in order to support improvement of individual student learning; (vi)  The State Department of Education shall determine feeder patterns of schools that do not earn a school grade because the grades and subjects taught at the school do not have statewide standardized assessments needed to calculate a school grade.  Upon determination of the feeder pattern, the department shall notify schools and school districts prior to the release of the school grades.  Feeder schools will be assigned the accountability designation of the school to which they provide students; (vii)  Standards for student, school and school district performance will be increased when student proficiency is at a seventy-five percent (75%) and/or when sixty-five percent (65%) of the schools and/or school districts are earning a grade of "B" or higher, in order to raise the standard on performance after targets are met; and (viii)  The system shall include student performance on the administration of a career-readiness assessment, such as, but not limited to, the ACT WorkKeys Assessment, deemed appropriate by the State Department of Education working in coordination with the Office of Workforce Development. (6)  Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require a nonpublic school that receives no local, state or federal funds for support to become accredited by the State Board of Education. (7)  The State Board of Education shall create an accreditation audit unit under the Commission on School Accreditation to determine whether schools are complying with accreditation standards. (8)  The State Board of Education shall be specifically authorized and empowered to withhold allocations from the total funding formula funds as provided in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 to any public school district for failure to timely report student, school personnel and fiscal data necessary to meet state and/or federal requirements. (9)  [Deleted] (10)  The State Board of Education shall establish, for those school districts failing to meet accreditation standards, a program of development to be complied with in order to receive state funds, except as otherwise provided in subsection (15) of this section when the Governor has declared a state of emergency in a school district or as otherwise provided in Section 206, Mississippi Constitution of 1890.  The state board, in establishing these standards, shall provide for notice to schools and sufficient time and aid to enable schools to attempt to meet these standards, unless procedures under subsection (15) of this section have been invoked. (11)  The State Board of Education shall be charged with the implementation of the program of development in each applicable school district as follows: (a)  Develop an impairment report for each district failing to meet accreditation standards in conjunction with school district officials; (b)  Notify any applicable school district failing to meet accreditation standards that it is on probation until corrective actions are taken or until the deficiencies have been removed.  The local school district shall develop a corrective action plan to improve its deficiencies.  For district academic deficiencies, the corrective action plan for each such school district shall be based upon a complete analysis of the following:  student test data, student grades, student attendance reports, student dropout data, existence and other relevant data. The corrective action plan shall describe the specific measures to be taken by the particular school district and school to improve:  (i) instruction; (ii) curriculum; (iii) professional development; (iv) personnel and classroom organization; (v) student incentives for performance; (vi) process deficiencies; and (vii) reporting to the local school board, parents and the community.  The corrective action plan shall describe the specific individuals responsible for implementing each component of the recommendation and how each will be evaluated.  All corrective action plans shall be provided to the State Board of Education as may be required.  The decision of the State Board of Education establishing the probationary period of time shall be final; (c)  Offer, during the probationary period, technical assistance to the school district in making corrective actions.  Subject to appropriations, the State Department of Education shall provide technical and/or financial assistance to all such school districts in order to implement each measure identified in that district's corrective action plan through professional development and on-site assistance.  Each such school district shall apply for and utilize all available federal funding in order to support its corrective action plan in addition to state funds made available under this paragraph; (d)  Assign department personnel or contract, in its discretion, with the institutions of higher learning or other appropriate private entities with experience in the academic, finance and other operational functions of schools to assist school districts; (e)  Provide for publication of public notice at least one time during the probationary period, in a newspaper published within the jurisdiction of the school district failing to meet accreditation standards, or if no newspaper is published therein, then in a newspaper having a general circulation therein.  The publication shall include the following:  declaration of school system's status as being on probation; all details relating to the impairment report; and other information as the State Board of Education deems appropriate.  Public notices issued under this section shall be subject to Section 13-3-31 and not contrary to other laws regarding newspaper publication. (12)  (a)  If the recommendations for corrective action are not taken by the local school district or if the deficiencies are not removed by the end of the probationary period, the Commission on School Accreditation shall conduct a hearing to allow the affected school district to present evidence or other reasons why its accreditation should not be withdrawn.  Additionally, if the local school district violates accreditation standards that have been determined by the policies and procedures of the State Board of Education to be a basis for withdrawal of school district's accreditation without a probationary period, the Commission on School Accreditation shall conduct a hearing to allow the affected school district to present evidence or other reasons why its accreditation should not be withdrawn.  After its consideration of the results of the hearing, the Commission on School Accreditation shall be authorized, with the approval of the State Board of Education, to withdraw the accreditation of a public school district, and issue a request to the Governor that a state of emergency be declared in that district. (b)  (i)  If the State Board of Education and the Commission on School Accreditation determine that an extreme emergency situation exists in a school district that jeopardizes the safety, security or educational interests of the children enrolled in the schools in that district and that emergency situation is believed to be related to a serious violation or violations of accreditation standards or state or federal law, the State Board of Education may request the Governor to declare a state of emergency in that school district.  For purposes of this paragraph, the declarations of a state of emergency district's impairments are related to a lack of financial may include the school district's serious failure to meet minimum academic standards, as evidenced by a continued pattern of poor student performance, or impairments related to a lack of financial resources. (ii)  If the State Board of Education determines that a public school or district in the state which, during each of two (2) consecutive school years or during two (2) of three (3) consecutive school years, receives an "F" designation by the State Board of Education under the accountability rating system or has been persistently failing as defined by the State Board of Education; or if the State Board of Education determines that a public school or district in the state which, during each of four (4) consecutive school years, receives a "D" or "F" designation by the State Board of Education under the accountability rating system or has been persistently failing as defined by the State Board of Education; or if more than fifty percent (50%) of the schools within a school district are designated as Schools-At-Risk in any one (1) year, then the board may place such school or district into a District of Transformation.  The State Board of Education shall take over only the number of schools and districts for which it has the capacity to serve.  The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations governing any additional requirements for placement into a District of Transformation and the operation thereof.  School districts or schools that are eligible to be placed into a District of Transformation due to poor academic performance but are not absorbed due to the capacity of the State Board of Education, shall develop and implement a district improvement plan with prescriptive guidance and support from the Mississippi Department of Education, with the goal of helping the district improve student achievement.  Failure of the school board, superintendent and school district staff to implement the plan with fidelity and participate in the activities provided as support by the department shall result in the school district retaining its eligibility for placement into a District of Transformation. (iii)  If the State Board of Education determined that a school district is impaired with a serious lack of financial resources, the State Board of Education may place the school district into a District of Transformation.  If a school district is placed into a District of Transformation for financial reasons, the school district shall be required to reimburse the state for any costs incurred by the state on behalf of the school district. (c)  Whenever the Governor declares a state of emergency in a school district in response to a request made under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, or when the State Board of Education places a school district into a District of Transformation due to poor academic performance or financial reasons, the State Board of Education may take one or more of the following actions: (i)  Declare a state of emergency, under which some or all of state funds can be escrowed except as otherwise provided in Section 206, Constitution of 1890, until the board determines corrective actions are being taken or the deficiencies have been removed, or that the needs of students warrant the release of funds.  The funds may be released from escrow for any program which the board determines to have been restored to standard even though the state of emergency may not as yet be terminated for the district as a whole; (ii)  Override any decision of the local school board or superintendent of education, or both, concerning the management and operation of the school district, or initiate and make decisions concerning the management and operation of the school district; (iii)  Assign an interim superintendent, or in its discretion, contract with a private entity with experience in the academic, finance and other operational functions of schools and school districts, who will have those powers and duties prescribed in subsection (15) of this section; (iv)  Grant transfers to students who attend this school district so that they may attend other accredited schools or districts in a manner that is not in violation of state or federal law; (v)  For states of emergency declared under paragraph (a) only, if the accreditation deficiencies are related to the fact that the school district is too small, with too few resources, to meet the required standards and if another school district is willing to accept those students, abolish that district and assign that territory to another school district or districts.  If the school district has proposed a voluntary consolidation with another school district or districts, then if the State Board of Education finds that it is in the best interest of the pupils of the district for the consolidation to proceed, the voluntary consolidation shall have priority over any such assignment of territory by the State Board of Education; (vi)  For actions taken pursuant to paragraph (b) only, reduce local supplements paid to school district employees, including, but not limited to, instructional personnel, assistant teachers and extracurricular activities personnel, if the district's impairment is related to a lack of financial resources, but only to an extent that will result in the salaries being comparable to districts similarly situated, as determined by the State Board of Education; (vii)  For actions taken pursuant to paragraph (b) only, the State Board of Education may take any action as prescribed in Section 37-17-13. (d)  At the time that satisfactory corrective action has been taken in a school district in which a state of emergency has been declared, the State Board of Education may request the Governor to declare that the state of emergency no longer exists in the district. (e)  The parent or legal guardian of a school-age child who is enrolled in a school district whose accreditation has been withdrawn by the Commission on School Accreditation and without approval of that school district may file a petition in writing to a school district accredited by the Commission on School Accreditation for a legal transfer.  The school district accredited by the Commission on School Accreditation may grant the transfer according to the procedures of Section 37-15-31(1)(b). In the event the accreditation of the student's home district is restored after a transfer has been approved, the student may continue to attend the transferee school district.  The per pupil amount of the total funding formula allotment for the student's home school district shall be transferred monthly to the school district accredited by the Commission on School Accreditation that has granted the transfer of the school-age child. (f)  Upon the declaration of a state of emergency for any school district in which the Governor has previously declared a state of emergency, the State Board of Education may either: (i)  Place the school district into district transformation, in which the school district shall remain until it has fulfilled all conditions related to district transformation.  If the district was assigned an accreditation rating of "D" or "F" when placed into district transformation, the district shall be eligible to return to local control when the school district has attained a "C" rating or higher for three (3) consecutive years; (ii)  Abolish the school district and administratively consolidate the school district with one or more existing school districts; (iii)  Reduce the size of the district and administratively consolidate parts of the district, as determined by the State Board of Education.  However, no school district which is not in district transformation shall be required to accept additional territory over the objection of the district; or (iv)  Require the school district to develop and implement a district improvement plan with prescriptive guidance and support from the State Department of Education, with the goal of helping the district improve student achievement.  Failure of the school board, superintendent and school district staff to implement the plan with fidelity and participate in the activities  provided as support by the department shall result in the school district retaining its eligibility for district transformation. (13)  Upon the declaration of a state of emergency in a school district under subsection (12) of this section, or upon the State Board of Education's placement of a school district into a District of Transformation for academic or financial reasons, the Commission on School Accreditation shall be responsible for public notice at least once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published within the jurisdiction of the school district failing to meet accreditation standards, or if no newspaper is published therein, then in a newspaper having a general circulation therein. The size of the notice shall be no smaller than one-fourth (1/4) of a standard newspaper page and shall be printed in bold print.  If an interim superintendent has been appointed for the school district, the notice shall begin as follows:  "By authority of Section 37-17-6, Mississippi Code of 1972, as amended, adopted by the Mississippi Legislature during the 1991 Regular Session, this school district (name of school district) is hereby placed under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Education acting through its appointed interim superintendent (name of interim superintendent)." The notice also shall include, in the discretion of the State Board of Education, any or all details relating to the school district's emergency status, including the declaration of a state of emergency in the school district and a description of the district's impairment deficiencies, conditions of any district transformation status and corrective actions recommended and being taken.  Public notices issued under this section shall be subject to Section 13-3-31 and not contrary to other laws regarding newspaper publication. Upon termination of a school district in a District of Transformation, the Commission on School Accreditation shall cause notice to be published in the school district in the same manner provided in this section, to include any or all details relating to the corrective action taken in the school district that resulted in the termination of the state of emergency. (14)  The State Board of Education or the Commission on School Accreditation shall have the authority to require school districts to produce the necessary reports, correspondence, financial statements, and any other documents and information necessary to fulfill the requirements of this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant any individual, corporation, board or interim superintendent the authority to levy taxes except in accordance with presently existing statutory provisions. (15)  (a)  Whenever the Governor declares a state of emergency in a school district in response to a request made under subsection (12) of this section, or when the State Board of Education places a school district into a District of Transformation for academic or financial reasons, the State Board of Education, in its discretion, may assign an interim superintendent to the school district, or in its discretion, may contract with an appropriate private entity with experience in the academic, finance and other operational functions of schools and school districts, who will be responsible for the administration, management and operation of the school district, including, but not limited to, the following activities: (i)  Approving or disapproving all financial obligations of the district, including, but not limited to, the employment, termination, nonrenewal and reassignment of all licensed and nonlicensed personnel, contractual agreements and purchase orders, and approving or disapproving all claim dockets and the issuance of checks; in approving or disapproving employment contracts of superintendents, assistant superintendents or principals, the interim superintendent shall not be required to comply with the time limitations prescribed in Sections 37-9-15 and 37-9-105; (ii)  Supervising the day-to-day activities of the district's staff, including reassigning the duties and responsibilities of personnel in a manner which, in the determination of the interim superintendent, will best suit the needs of the district; (iii)  Reviewing the district's total financial obligations and operations and making recommendations to the district for cost savings, including, but not limited to, reassigning the duties and responsibilities of staff; (iv)  Attending all meetings of the district's school board and administrative staff; (v)  Approving or disapproving all athletic, band and other extracurricular activities and any matters related to those activities; (vi)  Maintaining a detailed account of recommendations made to the district and actions taken in response to those recommendations; (vii)  Reporting periodically to the State Board of Education on the progress or lack of progress being made in the district to improve the district's impairments during the state of emergency; and (viii)  Appointing a parent advisory committee, comprised of parents of students in the school district that may make recommendations to the interim superintendent concerning the administration, management and operation of the school district. The cost of the salary of the interim superintendent and any other actual and necessary costs related to district transformation status paid by the State Department of Education shall be reimbursed by the local school district from funds other than total funding formula funds as provided in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215.  In the alternative, the local school district may pay the cost of the salary of the interim superintendent.  The department shall submit an itemized statement to the superintendent of the local school district for reimbursement purposes, and any unpaid balance may be withheld from the district's funding formula funds. At the time that the Governor, in accordance with the request of the State Board of Education, declares that the state of emergency no longer exists in a school district, the interim superintendent assigned to the district shall remain in place for a period of two (2) years and shall work alongside the newly reconstituted school board.  A new superintendent may be hired by the newly reconstituted board after the one (1) year state of emergency no longer exists, but he or she shall serve as deputy to the interim superintendent while the interim superintendent is assigned to the district. (b)  In order to provide loans to school districts under a state of emergency or in district transformation status that have impairments related to a lack of financial resources, the School District Emergency Assistance Fund is created as a special fund in the State Treasury into which monies may be transferred or appropriated by the Legislature from any available public education funds.  Funds in the School District Emergency Assistance Fund up to a maximum balance of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) annually shall not lapse but shall be available for expenditure in subsequent years subject to approval of the State Board of Education.  Any amount in the fund in excess of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) at the end of the fiscal year shall lapse into the State General Fund or the Education Enhancement Fund, depending on the source of the fund. The State Board of Education may loan monies from the School District Emergency Assistance Fund to a school district that is under a state of emergency or in district transformation status, in those amounts, as determined by the board, that are necessary to correct the district's impairments related to a lack of financial resources. The loans shall be evidenced by an agreement between the school district and the State Board of Education and shall be repayable in principal, without necessity of interest, to the School District Emergency Assistance Fund by the school district from any allowable funds that are available.  The total amount loaned to the district shall be due and payable within five (5) years after the impairments related to a lack of financial resources are corrected.  If a school district fails to make payments on the loan in accordance with the terms of the agreement between the district and the State Board of Education, the State Department of Education, in accordance with rules and regulations established by the State Board of Education, may withhold that district's total funding formula funds in an amount and manner that will effectuate repayment consistent with the terms of the agreement; the funds withheld by the department shall be deposited into the School District Emergency Assistance Fund. The State Board of Education shall develop a protocol that will outline the performance standards and requisite timeline deemed necessary for extreme emergency measures.  If the State Board of Education determines that an extreme emergency exists, simultaneous with the powers exercised in this subsection, it shall take immediate action against all parties responsible for the affected school districts having been determined to be in an extreme emergency.  The action shall include, but not be limited to, initiating civil actions to recover funds and criminal actions to account for criminal activity.  Any funds recovered by the State Auditor or the State Board of Education from the surety bonds of school officials or from any civil action brought under this subsection shall be applied toward the repayment of any loan made to a school district hereunder. (16)  [Deleted] (17)  [Deleted] (18)  The State Board of Education, acting through the Commission on School Accreditation, shall require each school district to comply with standards established by the State Department of Audit for the verification of fixed assets and the auditing of fixed assets records as a minimum requirement for accreditation. (19)  [Deleted] (20)  [Deleted] (21)  If a local school district is determined as failing and placed into district transformation status for reasons authorized by the provisions of this section, the interim superintendent appointed to the district shall, within forty-five (45) days after being appointed, present a detailed and structured corrective action plan to move the local school district out of district transformation status to the deputy superintendent.  A copy of the interim superintendent's corrective action plan shall also be filed with the State Board of Education. SECTION 25.  Section 37-57-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-57-107.  (1)  Beginning with the tax levy for the 1997 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the aggregate receipts from taxes levied for school district purposes pursuant to Sections 37-57-105 and 37-57-1 shall not exceed the aggregate receipts from those sources during any one (1) of the immediately preceding three (3) fiscal years, as determined by the school board, plus an increase not to exceed seven percent (7%).  For the purpose of this limitation, the term "aggregate receipts" when used in connection with the amount of funds generated in a preceding fiscal year shall not include excess receipts required by law to be deposited into a special account.  However, the term "aggregate receipts" includes any receipts required by law to be paid to a charter school.  The additional revenue from the ad valorem tax on any newly constructed properties or any existing properties added to the tax rolls or any properties previously exempt which were not assessed in the next preceding year may be excluded from the seven percent (7%) increase limitation set forth herein.  Taxes levied for payment of principal of and interest on general obligation school bonds issued heretofore or hereafter shall be excluded from the seven percent (7%) increase limitation set forth herein.  Any additional millage levied to fund any new program mandated by the Legislature shall be excluded from the limitation for the first year of the levy and included within such limitation in any year thereafter.  For the purposes of this section, the term "new program" shall include, but shall not be limited to, (a) the Early Childhood Education Program, as provided by Section 37-21-7, and any additional millage levied and the revenue generated therefrom, which is excluded from the limitation for the first year of the levy, to support the mandated Early Childhood Education Program shall be specified on the minutes of the school board and of the governing body making such tax levy; (b) any additional millage levied and the revenue generated therefrom, which shall be excluded from the limitation for the first year of the levy, for the purpose of generating additional local contribution funds required for the total funding formula as required by Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215; and (c) any additional millage levied and the revenue generated therefrom which shall be excluded from the limitation for the first year of the levy, for the purpose of support and maintenance of any agricultural high school which has been transferred to the control, operation and maintenance of the school board by the board of trustees of the community college district under provisions of Section 37-29-272. (2)  The seven percent (7%) increase limitation prescribed in this section may be increased an additional amount only when the school board has determined the need for additional revenues and has held an election on the question of raising the limitation prescribed in this section.  The limitation may be increased only if three-fifths (3/5) of those voting in the election shall vote for the proposed increase. The resolution, notice and manner of holding the election shall be as prescribed by law for the holding of elections for the issuance of bonds by the respective school boards.  Revenues collected for the fiscal year in excess of the seven percent (7%) increase limitation pursuant to an election shall be included in the tax base for the purpose of determining aggregate receipts for which the seven percent (7%) increase limitation applies for subsequent fiscal years. (3)  Except as otherwise provided for excess revenues generated pursuant to an election, if revenues collected as the result of the taxes levied for the fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 37-57-1 exceed the increase limitation, then it shall be the mandatory duty of the school board of the school district to deposit such excess receipts over and above the increase limitation into a special account and credit it to the fund for which the levy was made.  It will be the further duty of such board to hold the funds and invest the same as authorized by law.  Such excess funds shall be calculated in the budgets for the school districts for the purpose for which such levies were made, for the succeeding fiscal year.  Taxes imposed for the succeeding year shall be reduced by the amount of excess funds available.  Under no circumstances shall such excess funds be expended during the fiscal year in which such excess funds are collected. (4)  For the purposes of determining ad valorem tax receipts for a preceding fiscal year under this section, the term "fiscal year" means the fiscal year beginning October 1 and ending September 30. (5)  Beginning with the 2013-2014 school year, each school district in which a charter school is located shall pay to the charter school an amount for each student enrolled in the charter school equal to the ad valorem taxes levied per pupil for the support of the school district in which the charter school is located.  The pro rata ad valorem taxes to be transferred to the charter school must include all levies for the support of the school district under Sections 37-57-1 (local contribution to the total funding formula as required by Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215) and 37-57-105 (school district operational levy) but may not include any taxes levied for the retirement of school district bonded indebtedness or short-term notes or any taxes levied for the support of vocational-technical education programs.  Payments made pursuant to this subsection by a school district to a charter school must be made before the expiration of three (3) business days after the funds are distributed to the school district. SECTION 26.  Section 37-151-93, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-93.  (1)  Legally transferred students going from one school district to another shall be counted for total funding formula allotments by the school district wherein the pupils attend school, but shall be counted for transportation allotment purposes in the school district which furnishes or provides the transportation.  The school boards of the school districts which approve the transfer of a student under the provisions of Section 37-15-31 shall enter into an agreement and contract for the payment or nonpayment of any portion of their local maintenance funds which they deem fair and equitable in support of any transferred student. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, local maintenance funds shall be transferred only to the extent specified in the agreement and contract entered into by the affected school districts.  The terms of any local maintenance fund payment transfer contract shall be spread upon the minutes of both of the affected school district school boards.  The school district accepting any transfer students shall be authorized to accept tuition from such students under the provisions of Section 37-15-31(1) and such agreement may remain in effect for any length of time designated in the contract.  The terms of such student transfer contracts and the amounts of any tuition charged any transfer student shall be spread upon the minutes of both of the affected school boards.  No school district accepting any transfer students under the provisions of Section 37-15-31(2), which provides for the transfer of certain school district employee dependents, shall be authorized to charge such transfer students any tuition fees. (2)  Local maintenance funds shall be paid by the home school district to the transferee school district for students granted transfers under the provisions of Sections 37-15-29(3) and 37-15-31(3), not to exceed the student base amount, as defined in Section 37-151-201, multiplied by the number of such legally transferred students. SECTION 27.  Section 37-151-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-103.  (1)  Funds due each school district and charter school under the total funding formula provided in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 shall be paid in the following manner:  Two (2) business days prior to the last working day of each month there shall be paid to each school district and charter school, by electronic funds transfer, one-twelfth (1/12) of the funds to which the district or charter school is entitled from funds appropriated for total funding formula.  However, in December those payments shall be made on December 15 or the next business day after that date.  All school districts shall process a single monthly or a bimonthly payroll for employees, in the discretion of the local school board, with electronic settlement of payroll checks secured through direct deposit of net pay for all school district employees.  In addition, the State Department of Education may pay school districts and charter schools under the total funding formula on a date earlier than provided for by this section if it is determined that it is in the best interest of school districts and charter schools to do so. However, if the cash balance in the State General Fund is not adequate on the due date to pay the amounts due to all school districts and charter schools in the state as determined by the State Superintendent of Public Education, the State Fiscal Officer shall not transfer the funds payable to any school district or districts or charter schools until money is available to pay the amount due to all districts and charter schools. (2)  Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any other law requiring the number of children in net enrollment or the net enrollment of transported children to be determined on the basis of the preceding year, the State Board of Education is hereby authorized and empowered to make proper adjustments in allotments in cases where major changes in the number of children in net enrollment or the net enrollment of transported children occurs from one (1) year to another as a result of changes or alterations in the boundaries of school districts, the sending of children from one (1) county or district to another upon a contract basis, the termination or discontinuance of a contract for the sending of children from one (1) county or district to another, a change in or relocation of attendance centers, or for any other reason which would result in a major decrease or increase in the number of children in net enrollment or the net enrollment of transported children during the current school year as compared with the preceding year. SECTION 28.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.